Utah statutes.
59-12-2206.   Administration, collection, and enforcement of a sales and use tax under this part -- Transmission of revenues monthly by electronic funds transfer -- Transfer of revenues to a public transit district.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the commission shall administer, collect, and enforce a sales and use tax imposed under this part.

(2)  The commission shall administer, collect, and enforce a sales and use tax imposed under this part in accordance with:

(a)  the same procedures used to administer, collect, and enforce a tax under:

(i)  Part 1, Tax Collection; or

(ii)  Part 2, Local Sales and Use Tax Act; and

(b)  Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies.

(3)  A sales and use tax under this part is not subject to Subsections 59-12-205(2) through (6).

(4)  Subject to Section 59-12-2207 and except as provided in Subsection (5) or another provision of this part, the state treasurer shall transmit revenues collected within a county, city, or town from a sales and use tax under this part to the county, city, or town legislative body monthly by electronic funds transfer.

(5)  Subject to Section 59-12-2207, the state treasurer shall transfer revenues collected within a county, city, or town from a sales and use tax under this part directly to a public transit district organized under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act, if the county, city, or town legislative body:

(a)  provides written notice to the state treasurer requesting the transfer; and

(b)  designates the public transit district to which the county, city, or town legislative body requests the state treasurer to transfer the revenues.

